Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3,109
Charge for publications; authorized.

(1) The Department of Revenue may charge persons and state agencies for the following publications of the Department of Revenue: Department of Revenue Annual Report, Package XN, Department of Revenue Tax Expenditure Report, and the Department of Revenue State Funds Booklet. The Tax Commissioner shall set the price of such publications which shall be the cost of production.

(2) The Department of Revenue shall remit all funds received under this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 211;

Laws 2026, LB901, § 19.
July 1, 2026